Missouri, session 2026, HB2005.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated, for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
PART 1
Section 5.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 2
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. An
appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of a one-time
amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed to be a
component part of, and not in addition to, the stated appropriation
amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified as “one-
time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to any
ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2027. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.
Section 5.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Commissioner's Office, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and further provided
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to
expense and equipment, and five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.010, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025,
5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,197,806
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 84,348
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,282,154
For the Office of Equal Opportunity, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................416,228
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 65,089
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................481,317
For the purpose of a Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, provided
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................269,604
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,197,223

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 3
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,466,827
For the America 250 Missouri Commission
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................75,000
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ................................................... 25,000
Total (Not to exceed 21.50 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,330,298
Section 5.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and further
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service to expense and equipment, and five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.010, 5.015,
5.020, 5.025, 5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,933,180
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 105,949
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,039,129
For the implementation of a new enterprise resource planning system,
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service to expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,631,213
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,409,993
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................14,041,206
For costs associated with engagement of a vendor to provide
additional/back-up support of the ongoing maintenance of SAM
II, the legacy Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system, during
the pendency of the MOVERS implementation to replace SAM
II
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 119.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,080,335
Section 5.015. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Budget and Planning, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and
further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and five

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 4
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005,
5.010, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,360,889
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 109,913
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 24.50 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,470,802
Section 5.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.140, and provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between and within personal service and expense and
equipment within Section 5.020, and further provided that
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section
to Section 5.025 between the general revenue fund, twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.025 between federal funds, and twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.025 between
other funds, and five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 5.005, 5.010, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.050, 5.060, 5.075,
and 5.090
For Information Technology Services Division billings
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$11,326,343
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 43,016,444
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund (1980) ...................54,342,787
For providing state-wide information technology applications,
infrastructure, and administrative support
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,658,096
Expense and Equipment (including $13,150 one-time) ........................... 12,247,421
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................18,905,517
Personal Service ..................................................................................................141,400
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 790,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .........................................................................931,400
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,340,204
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,928,406
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................7,268,610

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 5
For a spatial data information service
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................166,666
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ...............................................................166,667
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ..............................166,667
For a cloud infrastructure monitoring and management project
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................208,512
For a network resiliency and operations project
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,810,000
For funding information technology security enhancements
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,214,639
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,021,285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................18,235,924
For maintenance and support of a citizen portal project
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,967,222
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,134,095
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................26,101,317
For a key management system
Personal Service ..................................................................................................380,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,020,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,400,000
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,499,000
For implementation of a secure, cloud-based data warehouse solution
which will allow for programmatic and citizen data integration
and sharing across the consolidated and non-consolidated
agencies, per a memorandum of understanding between the
Missouri House of Representatives, the Missouri Senate, the
Office of Administration, and the Judiciary
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,000,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 6
Total (Not to exceed 366.41 F.T.E.) ......................................................................$137,203,067
Section 5.021. To the Office of Administration
In accordance with Executive Orders 26-02 and 26-03, funds are
provided to the Information Technology Services Division
(ITSD) to establish a shared artificial intelligence (AI)
development environment, including necessary tooling,
platforms, and dedicated personnel. This infrastructure shall
serve as a foundational capability available to state agencies for
the responsible and secure integration of AI into government
operations. Funding shall support workforce productivity tools
and modernization efforts that reduce manual processes and
improve the delivery of services to Missouri citizens
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,800,000
Section 5.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.140, and provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between and within personal service and expense and
equipment within Section 5.025, and further provided twenty-
five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between and within
departments' general revenue funds, twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between and within departments' federal
funds, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between and within departments' other funds, and five percent
(5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.010, 5.015,
5.020, 5.025, 5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090, and further provided
that the Office of Administration Information Technology
Services shall transfer all units and services relating to Business
IT systems/applications starting with Medicaid systems to the
Department of Social Services and further provided that the
Office of Administration Information Technology Services shall
provide documentation of all expenditures, including time and
staffing resources, for Department of Social Services activities,
in order to meet the federal enhanced reporting requirements and
support the transition to Department of Social Services
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Personal Service ................................................................................................$777,665

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 7
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,336,522
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,114,187
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,898,737
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,762,353
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................4,661,090
Personal Service ..................................................................................................210,534
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 140,104
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................350,638
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For the replacement, implementation and maintenance of a system that
supports the foundation formula
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,663,800
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Personal Service ..................................................................................................815,698
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,470,964
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,286,662
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,040,533
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,689,880
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................2,730,413
Personal Service ....................................................................................................49,198
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 46,551
From Other Funds (Various) .............................................................................................95,749
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the replacement of the Financial Assistance for Missouri
Undergraduate Students system
Expense and Equipment
From Guaranty Agency Operating Fund (1880) ..........................................................1,200,000
For the Department of Revenue
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,288,803
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,009,114
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................26,297,917

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 8
Personal Service .............................................................................................................1
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ..........................................................2
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,282,682
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 28,989,359
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................30,272,041
For the Office of Administration
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,961,274
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,697,676
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................8,658,950
Personal Service .............................................................................................................1
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ..........................................................2
Personal Service ....................................................................................................66,821
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 592,625
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................659,446
For the Department of Agriculture
Personal Service ..................................................................................................362,555
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 395,938
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................758,493
Personal Service .............................................................................................................1
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ..........................................................2
Personal Service ..................................................................................................140,243
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 522,119
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................662,362
For the Department of Natural Resources
Personal Service ..................................................................................................654,593
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 908,145
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,562,738

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 9
Personal Service ..................................................................................................888,885
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,161,928
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................2,050,813
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,571,024
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,278,244
From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................6,849,268
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the development, testing, and deployment of the replacement of the
State Revolving Fund system
Expense and Equipment
From Natural Resources Protection Fund – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1568) ...........................................................................................1,013,744
From Water and Wastewater Loan Fund (1649) .........................................................1,000,000
100 For the Department of Economic Development
101 Personal Service ..................................................................................................320,256
102 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 492,404
103 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................812,660
104 Personal Service ....................................................................................................38,038
105 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 337,721
106 From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ...............................................375,759
107 Personal Service ..................................................................................................361,775
108 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 673,011
109 From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................1,034,786
110 For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
111 Personal Service ......................................................................................................1,361
112 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 240,415
113 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................241,776
114 Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,459,031
115 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,393,926
116 From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................5,852,957
117 For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 10
118 Personal Service .............................................................................................................1
119 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 277,902
120 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................277,903
121 Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,905,652
122 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 25,733,789
123 From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................30,639,441
124 Personal Service ..................................................................................................419,940
125 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 40,088,768
126 From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................40,508,708
127 For the Department of Public Safety
128 Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,188,508
129 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,933,325
130 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,121,833
131 Personal Service .............................................................................................................1
132 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 48,669
133 From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) .................................................48,670
134 Personal Service ..................................................................................................381,217
135 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,915,827
136 From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................3,297,044
137 For the Department of Public Safety
138 For the replacement and implementation of an electronic health records
139 system that supports the operation of veterans’ homes
140 Expense and Equipment
141 From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) ($1,227,739 one-time) .......................1,427,739
142 For the Department of Public Safety
143 For the maintenance and support of a nurse call system in veterans’
144 homes
145 Expense and Equipment
146 From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) ...............................................................350,000
147 For the Department of Corrections
148 Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,973,200
149 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,151,298

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 11
150 From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................13,124,498
151 Personal Service ......................................................................................................7,714
152 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1
153 From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ...................................................7,715
154 Personal Service ....................................................................................................94,597
155 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 190,589
156 From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................285,186
157 For the Department of Corrections
158 For an electronic health record module for the offender management
159 system
160 Expense and Equipment
161 From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................7,750,000
162 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
163 Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,477,367
164 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,142,353
165 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,619,720
166 Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,600,177
167 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,269,866
168 From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................22,870,043
169 Personal Service ..................................................................................................725,922
170 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,138,938
171 From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................2,864,860
172 For the Department of Mental Health
173 Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,900,464
174 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,540,858
175 From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................11,441,322
176 Personal Service ....................................................................................................57,158
177 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,667,468
178 From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................5,724,626
179 For the Department of Social Services
180 Personal Service ..................................................................................................696,941

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 12
181 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,079,640
182 From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,776,581
183 Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,070,872
184 Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,179,318
185 From Federal Funds (Various) ............................................................................. 5,250,190
186 Total (Not to exceed 449.85 F.T.E.) ......................................................................$262,592,334
Section 5.030. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division
For the centralized telephone billing system
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund (1980) .................$41,600,776
Section 5.035. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the E-
Procurement and State Technology Fund
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund (1980) .................$13,200,000
For receiving and expending funds for E-Procurement activities
From E-Procurement and State Technology Fund (1495) ................................... 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,200,000
Section 5.040. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division
For replacement of the statewide accounting and budget systems,
including consulting and procurement, per a memorandum of
understanding between the Missouri House of Representatives,
the Missouri Senate, the Office of Administration, and the
Judiciary; provided that a portion of the funds shall be used for
an independent third-party monitoring and compliance consultant
under the oversight of the Governor to provide quarterly updates
to the comprehensive review of the statewide accounting and
budget systems, known as MOVERS; said updates shall include
vendor role assessments, implementation status reports, and
recommendations regarding project governance or methodology;
provided further that payment for such services shall be
contingent upon confirmation of delivery of the quarterly updates
to the House Budget Committee Chair and Ranking Member and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 13
the Senate Appropriations Committee Chair and Ranking
Member; and provided further that the Governor may, upon
written determination that the monitoring objectives have been
fulfilled or that a realignment of oversight is in the best interest
of the project, and concurrence of the House Budget Committee
Chair and the Senate Appropriations Chair, authorize the
conclusion of such services or the modification of the scope of
work
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$27,183,712
From E-Procurement and State Technology Fund (1495) ................................... 6,560,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$33,743,712
Section 5.041. To the Office of Administration
For vendor costs associated with the revamped phased implementation
of the statewide Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system
modernization, including costs related to updates and redesign of
the Phase 1 Budget Enterprise Performance Management (EPM)
module currently in production, increased licensing, storage, and
processing costs necessary to support ongoing and revamped
implementation activities, and continued engagement of an
additional independent third-party monitoring, oversight, and
compliance consultant
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,021,457
Section 5.045. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as are necessary for allocation of costs to other funds in
support of the implementation of a new enterprise resource
planning system
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................$6,000,000
Section 5.050. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Personnel, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and further provided
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.010, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025,
5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 14
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,759,172
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,732,031
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,491,203
Personal Service ..................................................................................................157,280
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 471,555
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ..................................................................................................................628,835
Personal Service ....................................................................................................40,676
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,600
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund (1980) ..........................44,276
For the Center for Operational Excellence
Personal Service ..................................................................................................535,504
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 51,428
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 586,932
Total (Not to exceed 78.72 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,751,246
Section 5.055. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Personnel
For an employee suggestion program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$20,190
Section 5.060. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Purchasing and Materials Management, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 5.140, and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections
5.005, 5.010, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,736,587
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,464
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,747,051
Personal Service
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative
Fund (1122) .............................................................................................................3,484
From Department of Mental Health Federal Fund (1148) ................................................13,427
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ............................................................1,713

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 15
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ...........................................................................8,200
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ...........................................9,087
From DCI Administrative Fund (1503) ..............................................................................2,801
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ......................................................................................................................2,164
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................... 2,139
Total (Not to exceed 39.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,790,066
Section 5.065. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Purchasing and Materials Management
For refunding bid and performance bonds
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) .............................................................................................................$3,000,000
Section 5.070. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For authority to spend donated funds to support renovations and
operations of the Governor's Mansion
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) .....................................$120,000
Section 5.075. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For any and all expenditures necessary for funding the operations of the
Board of Public Buildings, state-owned and leased office
buildings, institutional facilities, laboratories, and support
facilities, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005,
5.010, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$27,440,041
Expense and Equipment (including $331,304 one-time) ......................... 112,046,446
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ................................139,486,487
For the Fletcher Daniel state office building leased parking spaces
Expense and Equipment
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ............................ 36,000
Total (Not to exceed 487.75 F.T.E.) ......................................................................$139,522,487

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 16
Section 5.080. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For funding expenditures associated with the State Capitol Commission
Expense and Equipment
From State Capitol Commission Fund (1745) ................................................................$25,000
Section 5.085. To the Board of Public Buildings
For the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For modifications, replacement, repair costs, and other support services
at state-operated facilities or institutions when recovery is
obtained from a third-party including energy rebates or disaster
recovery
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ..................................$2,000,000
Section 5.090. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and
further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and five percent
(5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.010, 5.015,
5.020, 5.025, 5.050, 5.060, 5.075, and 5.090
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,279,692
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 171,705
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,451,397
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,123,933
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 979,740
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ....................................................................................................... 5,103,673
Total (Not to exceed 104.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$6,555,070
Section 5.095. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the operation of the State Agency for Surplus Property
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,106,314

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 17
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 646,107
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) (Not to exceed 18.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$1,752,421
Section 5.100. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the Fixed Price Vehicle Program
Expense and Equipment
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) .............................................................$1,495,994
Section 5.105. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services for the heating assistance
program, as provided by Section 34.032, RSMo
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) ..................................................................$30,000
Section 5.110. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the disbursement of surplus property sales receipts
From Proceeds of Surplus Property Sales Fund (1710) ................................................$299,894
Section 5.115. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to various
state agency funds
From Proceeds of Surplus Property Sales Fund (1710) .............................................$4,000,000
Section 5.120. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Property Preservation Fund
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................$15,000,000
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ....................................5,000,000
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ....................................................................................................... 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$25,000,000
Section 5.125. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the repair or replacement of state-owned or leased facilities that have
suffered damage from natural or man-made events or for the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 18
defeasance of outstanding debt secured by the damaged facilities
when a notice of coverage has been issued by the Commissioner
of Administration, as provided by Sections 37.410 through
37.413, RSMo
From State Property Preservation Fund (1128) .......................................................$25,000,000
Section 5.130. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For rebillable expenses and for the replacement or repair of damaged
equipment when recovery is obtained from a third party
Expense and Equipment
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ...........................................................................................................$18,250,000
Section 5.135. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Sections 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$28,625,000
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 15,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$43,625,000
Section 5.140. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 5.145. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the payment of claims and expenses as provided by Section 105.711
et seq., RSMo, and for purchasing insurance against any or all
liability of the State of Missouri or any agency, officer, or
employee thereof
From State Legal Expense Fund (1692) ................................................................$100,000,236
Section 5.150. To the Office of Administration

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 19
For the Administrative Hearing Commission, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and
further provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,217,666
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 40,070
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,257,736
Personal Service
From Administrative Hearing Commission Educational Due Process
Hearing Fund (1818) .............................................................................................97,508
Personal Service ..................................................................................................233,716
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 92,800
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) ..................................... 326,516
Total (Not to exceed 18.50 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,681,760
Section 5.155. To the Office of Administration
For funding the Office of Child Advocate, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and
further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$429,855
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 19,147
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................449,002
Personal Service ..................................................................................................172,609
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,243
From Office of Administration – Federal Fund (1135) ....................................... 187,852
Total (Not to exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$636,854
Section 5.160. To the Office of Administration
For the administrative, promotional, and programmatic costs of the
Children's Trust Fund Board as provided by Section 210.173,
RSMo, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between expense and equipment and program disbursements
Personal Service ................................................................................................$580,842
Expense and Equipment ...................................................................................1,013,978

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 20
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 3,400,000
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694) .............................................................................4,994,820
For contracts with community-based programs designed to prevent child
sexual abuse, to be competitively awarded in accordance with
Section 210.172, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For the purpose of evidence-based home visitation programs
From Office of Administration – Federal Fund (1135) .............................................10,065,600
For a grant to a non-profit organization with a statewide service area and
mission that encompasses supporting families’ access to quality
childcare and early education. Such funds shall be used to
develop and implement community plans to improve access to
quality childcare and early education in conjunction with local
stakeholders, with priority given to rural communities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................900,000
For the purpose of funding Regional Collective Impact Hubs, provided
that each site will coordinate home visiting providers in their
catchment area, establish a referral system, provide quality
improvement and training, and further provided that all high-risk
families are served
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For a child care cost-sharing program for families with household
incomes not to exceed the amount provided in section 166.700,
RSMO., provided that families who otherwise have access to
subsidized child care through the state shall be ineligible,
provided that the program shall prioritize serving eligible
families with the lowest household incomes, areas of the state
designated as child care deserts, and supporting access to infant
and toddler child care, and further provided that the state subsidy
under this program shall be no greater than 40% of the child care
subsidy payment under the Office of Childhood child care
subsidy program, and further provided that in order to be eligible
for subsidy under this section the employer or community must
contribute at least 30% of the cost of child care, and further

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 21
provided that at that at least 95% of program funds shall be used
to directly subsidize child care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000
For administering evidence-based home visitation programs supporting
Missouri families at greatest risk for poor health outcomes and/or
involvement in the child welfare system
Personal Service ..................................................................................................200,000
Expense and Equipment ..........................................................................................1,467
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 4,611,500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,812,967
Personal Service ..................................................................................................200,000
Expense and Equipment ......................................................................................201,834
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 8,317,508
From Office of Administration – Federal Fund (1135) ...............................................8,719,342
For providing evidence-based home visiting services to at-risk, low-
income families
Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 2,900,000
Total (Not to exceed 12.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$38,892,729
Section 5.165. To the Office of Administration
For funding the Governor's Council on Disability, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.140, and
further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$246,619
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 26,134
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 4.00 F.T.E.) ...............................$272,753
Section 5.170. To the Office of Administration
For those services provided through the Office of Administration that are
contracted with and reimbursed by the Board of Trustees of the
Missouri Public Entity Risk Management Fund as provided by
Chapter 537, RSMo
Personal Service
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 22
(1505) (Not to exceed 14.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................$1,045,372
Section 5.175. To the Office of Administration
For the Missouri Ethics Commission, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,604,587
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 296,361
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 24.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$1,900,948
Section 5.180. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of rent by the state for state agencies occupying Board of
Public Buildings revenue bond financed buildings. Funds are to
be used for principal, interest, bond issuance costs, and reserve
fund requirements of Board of Public Buildings bonds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$60,083,007
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .......................................................................3,805,315
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ............................................. 7,211,344
Total .........................................................................................................................$71,099,666
Section 5.185. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For annual fees, arbitrage rebate, refunding, defeasance, and related
expenses of House Bill 5 debt
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$30,654
Section 5.190. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state's lease/purchase debt requirements
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ..................................$2,406,257
Section 5.195. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For debt service and all related expenses associated with the State
Historical Society Project bonds issued through the Missouri
Development Finance Board
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,286,544

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 23
Section 5.200. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds to the Fulton State Hospital Bond Fund for debt
payments on bonds issued by the Missouri Development Finance
Board pursuant to a finance agreement between the Missouri
Development Finance Board, Office of Administration, and
Department of Mental Health for a project to replace Fulton State
Hospital, not to exceed $220 million in total bonding principal
and for related expenses
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,692,925
Section 5.205. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For debt service related to the Fulton State Hospital bonds
From Fulton State Hospital Bond and Interest Fund (1396)......................................$8,696,350
Section 5.210. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For debt service and all related expenses associated with the Missouri
State Fair project bonds issued in one or more series by the
Missouri Development Finance Board, with a term for each series
not to exceed twenty years and annual debt service for all series
payable in any year not to exceed $4,200,000, to fund not to
exceed $55,000,000 of the costs to plan, design, construct,
renovate, acquire land, upgrade a livestock support barn and a
stalling barn at the Missouri State Fair pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Missouri Development Finance Board
and the Office of Administration, provided one-hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between the General Revenue Fund
and other funds in this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,200,000
From State Fair Fee Fund (1410) ......................................................................... 1
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,200,001
Section 5.215. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For Debt Management
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$83,300

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 24
Section 5.220. To the Office of Administration
For the Bartle Hall Convention Center expansion, operations,
development, or maintenance in Kansas City pursuant to Sections
67.638 through 67.641, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 5.225. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For the maintenance of the Jackson County Sports Complex pursuant to
Sections 67.638 through 67.641, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 5.230. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund I-70 Project Fund in pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Commission and the Office of
Administration. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be deposited to the
credit of the OA-I70 Project Fund and any moneys remaining in
the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert back to the
credit of the general revenue fund
From OA I-70 Project Fund (1334) ....................................................................$1,219,287,198
Section 5.235. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund I-44 Improvement Fund in pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Commission and the Office of
Administration. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any future
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
deposited to the credit of the I-44 Improvement Fund and any
moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert back to the credit of the general revenue fund
From I-44 Improvement Fund (1332) ....................................................................$201,042,740
Section 5.236. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 25
From I-44 Improvement Fund (1332) (one-time) ......................................................$7,500,000
Section 5.240. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For interest payments on federal grant monies in accordance with the
Cash Management Improvement Act of 1990 and 1992, and any
other interest or penalties due to the federal government
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,400,000
From Office of Administration – Federal Fund (1135) ....................................................20,000
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) ....................................................... 20,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,440,000
Section 5.245. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to the Budget Reserve Fund and other funds, such amounts as
may be necessary for cash-flow assistance to various funds,
provided, however, that funds other than the Budget Reserve
Fund will not be used without prior notification to the
Commissioner of the Office of Administration, the Chair and
Ranking Member of the Senate Appropriations Committee, and
the Chair and Ranking Member of the House Budget Committee.
Cash-flow assistance from funds other than the Budget Reserve
Fund shall only be transferred from May 15 to June 30 in any
fiscal year, and an amount equal to the transfer received, plus
interest, shall be transferred back to the appropriate Other Funds
prior to June 30 of the fiscal year in which the transfer was made
From Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds to General Revenue Fund
(Various) ....................................................................................................$550,000,000
From Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds to Other Funds (Various) ............ 100,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$650,000,000
Section 5.250. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for repayment of cash-flow
assistance to the Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds,
provided, however, that the Commissioner of the Office of
Administration, the Chair and Ranking Member of the Senate
Appropriations Committee, and the Chair and Ranking Member
of the House Budget Committee shall be notified when

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 26
repayment to funds, other than the Budget Reserve Fund, has
been made
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$550,000,000
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 100,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$650,000,000
Section 5.255. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for interest payments on cash-flow
assistance, to the Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,500,000
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,000,000
Section 5.260. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for constitutional requirements of
the Budget Reserve Fund, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from Sections 5.305, 5.320, and 5.350 to
this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,000,000
From Budget Reserve Fund (1100)...................................................................... 52,195,461
Total .........................................................................................................................$59,195,461
Section 5.265. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for corrections to fund balances,
provided one hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed
between federal and other funds within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
From Federal Funds (Various) ........................................................................................300,000
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 450,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$800,000
Section 5.270. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as are necessary for allocation of costs to other funds in
support of the state's central services performed by the Office of
Administration, the Department of Revenue, the Capitol Police,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 27
the Elected Officials, and the General Assembly, to the General
Revenue Fund
From Other Funds (Various) ....................................................................................$10,184,620
Section 5.275. To the Office of Administration
For funding statewide membership dues
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$222,000
Section 5.280. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For paying the several counties of Missouri the amount that has been paid
into the State Treasury by the United States Treasury as a refund
from the leases of flood control lands, under the provisions of an
Act of Congress approved June 28, 1938, to be distributed to
certain counties in Missouri in accordance with the provisions of
state law, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 5.280 and 5.285
From Office of Administration – Federal Fund (1135) .............................................$2,300,000
Section 5.285. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For paying the several counties of Missouri the amount that has been paid
into the State Treasury by the United States Treasury as a refund
from the National Forest Reserve, under the provisions of an Act
of Congress approved June 28, 1938, to be distributed to certain
counties in Missouri, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.280 and 5.285
From Office of Administration – Federal Fund (1135) .............................................$6,000,000
Section 5.290. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payments to counties for county correctional prosecution
reimbursements pursuant to Sections 50.850 and 50.853, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$60,000
Section 5.295. To the Office of Administration
For distribution of state grants to regional planning commissions and
local governments as provided by Chapter 251, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$560,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 28
Section 5.300. To the Office of Administration
For funding transition costs for the State Auditor
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$10,000
Section 5.305. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for state employees and participating political
subdivisions to the OASDHI Contributions Fund, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between federal and other
funds within this section, and further provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.260
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$117,330,910
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................47,317,600
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 70,097,689
Total .......................................................................................................................$234,746,199
Section 5.310. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For transferring funds for employees of the State Highway Patrol to the
OASDHI Contributions Fund, said transfers to be administered
by the Office of Administration
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................$11,951,231
Section 5.315. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For the payment of OASDHI taxes for all state employees and for
participating political subdivisions within the state to the
Treasurer of the United States for compliance with current
provisions of Title 2 of the Federal Social Security Act, as
amended, in accordance with the agreement between the State
Social Security Administrator and the Secretary of the
Department of Health and Human Services, and for
administration of the agreement under Section 218 of the Social
Security Act which extends Social Security benefits to state and
local public employees
From OASDHI Contributions Fund (1702) ...........................................................$246,697,430
Section 5.320. To the Office of Administration

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 29
For transferring funds for the state's contribution to the Missouri State
Employees' Retirement System to the State Retirement
Contributions Fund, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between federal and other funds within this section, and
further provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 5.260
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $41,893,000 one-time) ..............$533,269,000
From Federal Funds (Various) (including $4,757,000 one-time) ............................157,061,000
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 174,215,173
Total .......................................................................................................................$864,545,173
Section 5.325. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state's contribution to the Missouri State Employees'
Retirement System, provided that no more than $17,995,380 shall
be expended on administration of the system, excluding
investment expenses
From State Retirement Contributions Fund (1701) (including
$46,650,000 one-time) ...............................................................................$864,545,173
Section 5.330. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state's contribution to the Missouri State Employees'
Retirement System, for accelerated payments to the state
contribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$367,966,000
Section 5.335. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of retirement benefits to the Public School Retirement
System pursuant to Section 104.342, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$30,000
Section 5.336. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for state employees who are qualified participants
in the state Deferred Compensation Plan in accordance with
Section 105.927, RSMo, who contribute at least $25 per month,
and pursuant to Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 30
the Missouri State Employees’ Deferred Compensation Incentive
Plan Administration Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,226,176
From Federal Funds (Various) .....................................................................................2,105,525
Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................. 4,177,296
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,508,997
Section 5.337. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for the state’s contribution to the Missouri State
Employees’ Deferred Compensation Incentive Plan
Administration Fund for employees of the State Highway Patrol,
said transfers to be administered by the Office of Administration
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ..............................$91,003
Section 5.338. To the Office of Administration
For the payment of funds credited by the state at a maximum rate of $25
per month per qualified participant in accordance with Section
105.927, RSMo, who contribute at least $25 per month, to
deferred compensation investment companies
From Missouri State Employees’ Deferred Compensation Incentive Plan
Administration Fund (1706) ........................................................................$11,600,000
Section 5.340. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For reimbursing the Division of Employment Security benefit account
for claims paid to former state employees for unemployment
insurance coverage and for related professional services,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between federal
and other funds within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,430,053
From Federal Funds (Various) ........................................................................................784,000
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 1,616,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,830,053
Section 5.345. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For reimbursing the Division of Employment Security benefit account
for claims paid to former state employees of the Department of

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 31
Public Safety for unemployment insurance coverage and for
related professional services
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$100,000
Section 5.350. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for the state's contribution to the Missouri
Consolidated Health Care Plan to the Missouri Consolidated
Health Care Plan Benefit Fund, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between federal and other funds within this
section, and further provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.260
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$384,602,639
From Federal Funds (Various) .................................................................................149,260,259
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 91,932,435
Total .......................................................................................................................$625,795,333
Section 5.355. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state's contribution to the Missouri Consolidated
Health Care Plan, provided that no more than $11,052,928 shall
be expended on administration of the plan, excluding third-party
administrator fees
From Missouri Consolidated Health Care Plan Benefit Fund (1765) ....................$625,795,332
Section 5.360. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For paying refunds for overpayment or erroneous payment of employee
withholding taxes
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$60,000
Section 5.365. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For providing voluntary life insurance
From Missouri State Employees’ Voluntary Life Insurance Fund (1910) ................$3,900,000
Section 5.370. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For employee medical expense reimbursements reserve
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 32
Section 5.375. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
Personal Service for state payroll contingency
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$36,000
Section 5.380. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the provision of workers' compensation benefits to state employees
through either a self-insurance program administered by the
Office of Administration and/or by contractual agreement with a
private carrier and for administrative and legal expenses
authorized, in part, by Section 105.810, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$48,207,773
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) .................................................... 1,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$49,407,773
Section 5.385. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to various funds, amounts paid from the General Revenue Fund
for workers' compensation benefits provided to employees paid
from these other funds, to the General Revenue Fund, provided
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between federal and other
funds within this section
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................$5,016,792
From Other Funds (Various) ................................................................................ 3,949,150
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,965,942
Section 5.390. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For workers' compensation tax payments pursuant to Section 287.690,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,375,000
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) .................................................... 125,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,500,000
PART 2
Section 5.2010. To the Office of Administration

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2005 33
In reference to all sections of Part 1 of this act:
No funds appropriated in this act shall be expended by the Office
of Administration for major hardware refreshes, expansion of
state-operated data center infrastructure, or development of new
custom on-premise applications unless the department, in
coordination with the Information Technology Services Division,
obtains the services of (an) independent third-party vendor(s) to
conduct an evaluation and develop a comprehensive plan for the
possible transition of the state’s information technology
operations from a capital expenditure model to an operational
expenditure model. Such expenditures and plans shall be
reviewed first by the House Budget Committee Chair and
Ranking Member and the Senate Appropriations Chair and
Ranking Member and then reviewed and approved through the
Cabinet IT Governance Council (CITGC). The Office of
Administration, in conjunction with the Information Technology
Services Division, shall establish a Chief Innovation and
Technology Officer, responsible for evaluating, coordinating,
and advancing modernization of state information technology
systems toward scalable, consumption-based service models,
including cloud, software-as-a-service, data, artificial
intelligence (AI), enterprise architecture, and financial
operations.
Office of Administration Totals
General Revenue Fund (742.29 F.T.E.) .................................................................$382,891,190
Federal Funds (214.47 F.T.E.) .................................................................................108,610,353
Other Funds (832.47 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 192,400,832
Total (1,789.23 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$683,902,375
Employee Benefits Totals
General Revenue Fund ........................................................................................$1,093,507,552
Federal Funds ...........................................................................................................356,528,384
Other Funds .......................................................................................................... 359,405,827
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,809,441,763
